Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 6. Oral Chemotherapy Parity

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 26-20-601.
Oral chemotherapy parity with injectable and intravenous.

No individual or group health insurance policy providing coverage on an expense incurred basis, individual and group service or indemnity type contract issued by any insurer including any nonprofit corporation and individual and no group service contract issued by a health maintenance organization, shall require a higher copayment, deductible or coinsurance amount for oral chemotherapy than required for injected or intravenous chemotherapy, regardless of the formulation or benefit category determination by the policy or contract issuer.

No issuer of a health insurance policy or contract shall comply with subsection (a) of this section by increasing the copayment, deductible or coinsurance amount required for covered injected or intravenous chemotherapy or by reclassifying benefits with respect to cancer treatment medications.

This section shall apply to all policies and contracts, as described in subsection (a) of this section, issued or renewed after July 1, 2015.

For purposes of this section, “chemotherapy” means administration of drugs and biologics to kill, slow or prevent the growth of cancerous cells.

History:

2015 ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 161, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.